Tennessee, session 114, SB0160.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-61-102, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
(g) If a municipal governing body does not provide ambulance service within the
boundaries of the municipality and the county in which the city lies provides ambulance
service within the municipality, then the municipal governing body shall reimburse the
county for the ambulance service provided in proportion to the municipality's population
to the population of the county, according to the most recent federal census; provided,
that the reimbursement must not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the total cost of providing
the ambulance service.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0160
000426
- 1 -